Utah statutes.
73-5a-702.   Civil penalties -- Costs -- Civil liability.

(1)  Any person who violates this chapter or any lawful notice or order issued pursuant to this chapter shall be assessed a penalty not to exceed $5,000 per violation in a civil proceeding.

(2)  In the case of a continuing violation, each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate and distinct offense.

(3)  Any person who violates this chapter shall be liable for any expenses incurred by the state engineer in abating any violation of this chapter.

(4)  A penalty assessment under this chapter does not relieve the person assessed from civil liability for claims arising out of any act which was also a violation.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 1990 General Session

